Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,108
School of cosmetology; student instructors; limitation.

No school of cosmetology shall at any time enroll more than three student instructors for each full-time instructor actively working in and employed by the school.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 107;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,146;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 370;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 34.